Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.190

Funding staff support—Rules.

The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

[ 2002 c 313 s 77.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.